Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3603
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the County Industrial Sewer Construction Act:

(1) County shall mean any county with a population in excess of one hundred thousand inhabitants according to the most recent federal decennial census and at least forty percent of the population residing within the corporate boundaries of cities of the first and second class located in the county; and

(2) Sewerage disposal system and plant or plants shall mean and include any system or works above or below ground which has for its purpose the removal, discharge, conduction, carrying, treatment, purification, or disposal of liquid and solid waste and night soil.

Laws 1994, LB 1139, § 3.